Nevada, session 83, AB180.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 244 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. A board of county commissioners that has
adopted an ordinance regulating sidewalk vendors pursuant to
NRS 244.35483 which requires a sidewalk vendor to hold a permit
or license for sidewalk vending, shall enter into an agreement in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 277.080 to 277.180,
inclusive, with the city council or other governing body of each
incorporated city whose population is 60,000 or more located
within the county and with the governing body of each
incorporated city located within the county whose population is
less than 60,000 who chooses to enter into such an agreement for
the establishment of a business license to authorize a person who
is permitted or licensed as a sidewalk vendor pursuant to this
section and NRS 244.35481 to 244.35488, inclusive, to engage in
the business of sidewalk vending within the county and each of
those cities.
2. The agreement required pursuant to subsection 1 must set
forth the purposes, powers, rights, obligations and responsibilities,
financial and otherwise, of the county and each city that enters
into the agreement.
3. Upon entering into the agreement required pursuant to
subsection 1, the board of county commissioners shall establish by
ordinance a system for issuing a business license that authorizes a
person who is permitted or licensed as a sidewalk vendor pursuant
-
*AB180*

– 4 –
to this section and NRS 244.35481 to 244.35488, inclusive, to
engage in the business of sidewalk vending within the county and
each city that entered into the agreement pursuant to subsection 1
and in which the person intends to conduct business.
4. An ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection 3 must
include, without limitation:
(a) The requirements for obtaining the business license;
(b) The fees for issuance and renewal of the business license;
and
(c) Any other requirements necessary to establish the system
for issuing the business license.
5. A person who is required to hold a permit or license for
sidewalk vending pursuant to this section and NRS 244.35481 to
244.35488, inclusive, is eligible to obtain from the county a
business license that authorizes the person to engage in the
business of sidewalk vending within the county and each city
located in the county which enters into an agreement pursuant to
subsection 1 and in which the person intends to engage in the
business of sidewalk vending if the person meets the requirements
to obtain the license set forth in the ordinance adopted pursuant to
subsection 3.
6. A person who obtains a business license described in this
section is subject to:
(a) All requirements of the county or city in which the person
is doing business that are set forth in an ordinance regulating
sidewalk vendors adopted pursuant to NRS 244.35485 or
268.097993; and
(b) All other licensing and permitting requirements of the
State and any other counties and cities in which the person does
business.
7. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter and NRS
239.0115, all personal information connected to a business license
issued pursuant to this section is confidential and must not be
disclosed except as required to administer the system established
pursuant to subsection 3 or to comply with a state law or state or
federal court order.
Sec. 3. 1. The board of county commissioners in each
county whose population is 100,000 or more shall enter into an
agreement in accordance with the provisions of NRS 277.080 to
277.180, inclusive, with the city council or other governing body of
each incorporated city whose population is 60,000 or more located
within the county and with the city council or other governing
body of each incorporated city located within the county whose
population is less than 60,000 who chooses to enter into such an
agreement for the establishment of a business license to authorize
-
*AB180*

– 5 –
a person who is both licensed as a food establishment and
operating as a mobile unit pursuant to chapter 446 of NRS to
engage in the business of operating as a mobile unit within the
county and each of those cities.
2. The agreement required pursuant to subsection 1 must set
forth the purposes, powers, rights, obligations and responsibilities,
financial and otherwise, of the county and each city that enters
into the agreement.
3. Upon entering into the agreement pursuant to subsection
1, the board of county commissioners shall establish by ordinance
a system for issuing such a business license that authorizes a
person who is both licensed as a food establishment and operating
as a mobile unit pursuant to chapter 446 of NRS to engage in that
business within the county and each city that entered into the
agreement pursuant to subsection 1 and in which the person
intends to conduct business.
4. An ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection 3 must
include, without limitation:
(a) The requirements for obtaining the business license;
(b) The fees for issuance and renewal of the business license;
and
(c) Any other requirements necessary to establish the system
for issuing the business license.
5. A person who is both licensed as a food establishment and
operating as a mobile unit pursuant to chapter 446 of NRS is
eligible to obtain from the county a business license that
authorizes the person to engage in that business within the county
and each city located in the county which enters into an
agreement pursuant to subsection 1 and in which the person
intends to conduct business if the person meets the requirements
for obtaining the business license set forth in the ordinance
adopted pursuant to subsection 3.
6. A person who obtains a business license described in this
section is subject to all other requirements of the county or city in
which the person is doing business and all other licensing and
permitting requirements of the State and any other counties and
cities in which the person does business.
7. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter and NRS
239.0115, all personal information connected to a business license
issued pursuant to this section is confidential and must not be
disclosed except as required to administer the licensure program
or comply with a state law or state or federal court order.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Food establishment” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 446.020.
-
*AB180*

– 6 –
(b) “Mobile unit” means any vehicle operating from an
approved servicing area in which food, beverages, frozen desserts
or dairy products and mixes are prepared, processed or converted
for human consumption and which is used to sell and dispense
food and beverages to customers. The term does not include a
push cart or any similar operation.
Sec. 4. NRS 244.335 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.335 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2, 3,
4 and 9, and NRS 244.33501, 244.35253, 244.3535 and 244.35351
to 244.35359, inclusive, a board of county commissioners may:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 244.331 to 244.3345,
inclusive, 598D.150 and 640C.100, 244.35481 to 244.35488,
inclusive, and sections 2 and 3 of this act, regulate all character of
lawful trades, callings, industries, occupations, professions and
business conducted in its county outside of the limits of
incorporated cities and towns.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 244.3359 and 576.128,
fix, impose and collect a license tax for revenue or for regulation, or
for both revenue and regulation, on such trades, callings, industries,
occupations, professions and business.
2. The county license boards have the exclusive power in their
respective counties to regulate entertainers employed by an
entertainment by referral service and the business of conducting a
dancing hall, escort service, entertainment by referral service or
gambling game or device permitted by law, outside of an
incorporated city. The county license boards may fix, impose and
collect license taxes for revenue or for regulation, or for both
revenue and regulation, on such employment and businesses.
3. A board of county commissioners shall not require that a
person who is licensed as a contractor pursuant to chapter 624 of
NRS obtain more than one license to engage in the business of
contracting or pay more than one license tax related to engaging in
the business of contracting, regardless of the number of
classifications or subclassifications of licensing for which the person
is licensed pursuant to chapter 624 of NRS.
4. The board of county commissioners or county license board
shall not require a person to obtain a license or pay a license tax on
the sole basis that the person is a professional. As used in this
subsection, “professional” means a person who:
(a) Holds a license, certificate, registration, permit or similar
type of authorization issued by a regulatory body as defined in NRS
622.060 or who is regulated pursuant to the Nevada Supreme Court
Rules; and
(b) Practices his or her profession for any type of compensation
as an employee.
-
*AB180*

– 7 –
5. The county license board shall provide upon request an
application for a state business license pursuant to chapter 76 of
NRS. No license to engage in any type of business may be granted
unless the applicant for the license:
(a) Signs an affidavit affirming that the business has complied
with the provisions of chapter 76 of NRS; or
(b) Provides to the county license board the business
identification number of the applicant assigned by the Secretary of
State pursuant to NRS 225.082 which the county may use to
validate that the applicant is currently in good standing with the
State and has complied with the provisions of chapter 76 of NRS.
6. No license to engage in business as a seller of tangible
personal property may be granted unless the applicant for the
license:
(a) Presents written evidence that:
(1) The Department of Taxation has issued or will issue a
permit for this activity, and this evidence clearly identifies the
business by name; or
(2) Another regulatory agency of the State has issued or will
issue a license required for this activity; or
(b) Provides to the county license board the business
identification number of the applicant assigned by the Secretary of
State pursuant to NRS 225.082 which the county may use to
validate that the applicant is currently in good standing with the
State and has complied with the provisions of paragraph (a).
7. Any license tax levied for the purposes of NRS 244.3358 or
244A.597 to 244A.655, inclusive, constitutes a lien upon the real
and personal property of the business upon which the tax was levied
until the tax is paid. The lien has the same priority as a lien for
general taxes. The lien must be enforced:
(a) By recording in the office of the county recorder, within 6
months after the date on which the tax became delinquent or was
otherwise determined to be due and owing, a notice of the tax lien
containing the following:
(1) The amount of tax due and the appropriate year;
(2) The name of the record owner of the property;
(3) A description of the property sufficient for identification;
and
(4) A verification by the oath of any member of the board of
county commissioners or the county fair and recreation board; and
(b) By an action for foreclosure against the property in the same
manner as an action for foreclosure of any other lien, commenced
within 2 years after the date of recording of the notice of the tax
lien, and accompanied by appropriate notice to other lienholders.
-
*AB180*

– 8 –
8. The board of county commissioners may delegate the
authority to enforce liens from taxes levied for the purposes of NRS
244A.597 to 244A.655, inclusive, to the county fair and recreation
board. If the authority is so delegated, the board of county
commissioners shall revoke or suspend the license of a business
upon certification by the county fair and recreation board that the
license tax has become delinquent, and shall not reinstate the license
until the tax is paid. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115
and 244.3357, all information concerning license taxes levied by an
ordinance authorized by this section or other information concerning
the business affairs or operation of any licensee obtained as a result
of the payment of such license taxes or as the result of any audit or
examination of the books by any authorized employee of a county
fair and recreation board of the county for any license tax levied for
the purpose of NRS 244A.597 to 244A.655, inclusive, is
confidential and must not be disclosed by any member, officer or
employee of the county fair and recreation board or the county
imposing the license tax unless the disclosure is authorized by the
affirmative action of a majority of the members of the appropriate
county fair and recreation board. Continuing disclosure may be so
authorized under an agreement with the Department of Taxation or
Secretary of State for the exchange of information concerning
taxpayers.
9. Except as otherwise provided by regulations adopted by the
Cannabis Compliance Board pursuant to NRS 678B.645, a board of
county commissioners shall not license or otherwise allow a person
to operate a business that allows cannabis, as defined in NRS
678A.085, or cannabis products, as defined in NRS 678A.120, to be
consumed on the premises of the business, other than a cannabis
consumption lounge, as defined in NRS 678A.087, in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 678B of NRS.
Sec. 5. NRS 244.33501 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.33501 1. The board of county commissioners in each
county whose population is [700,000] 100,000 or more shall enter
into an agreement in accordance with the provisions of NRS
277.080 to 277.180, inclusive, with the governing body of each city
whose population is [150,000] 60,000 or more located within the
county and with the governing body of each city located within the
county whose population is less than [150,000] 60,000 who chooses
to enter into such an agreement for the establishment of a business
license to authorize a person who is licensed as a contractor
pursuant to chapter 624 of NRS to engage in the business of
contracting within the county and each of those cities.
2. The agreement required pursuant to subsection 1 must set
forth the purposes, powers, rights, obligations and responsibilities,
-
*AB180*

– 9 –
financial and otherwise, of the county and each city that enters into
the agreement.
3. Upon entering into the agreement required pursuant to
subsection 1, the board of county commissioners shall establish by
ordinance a system for issuing such a business license that
authorizes a person who is licensed as a contractor pursuant to
chapter 624 of NRS to engage in the business of contracting within
the county and each city that entered into the agreement pursuant to
subsection 1 and in which the person intends to conduct business.
4. An ordinance adopted pursuant to the provisions of
subsection 3 must include, without limitation:
(a) The requirements for obtaining the business license;
(b) The fees for the issuance and renewal of the business license;
and
(c) Any other requirements necessary to establish the system for
issuing the business license.
5. A person who is licensed as a contractor pursuant to chapter
624 of NRS is eligible to obtain from the county a business license
that authorizes the person to engage in the business of contracting
within the county and each city located in the county which enters
into an agreement pursuant to subsection 1 and in which the person
intends to conduct business if the person meets the requirements set
forth in the ordinance to qualify for the license and:
(a) The person maintains only one place of business within the
county and the place of business is located within the
unincorporated area of the county;
(b) The person maintains more than one place of business within
the county and each of those places of business is located within the
unincorporated area of the county; or
(c) The person does not maintain any place of business within
the county.
6. A person who obtains a business license described in this
section is subject to all other licensing and permitting requirements
of the State and any other counties and cities in which the person
does business.
Sec. 6. NRS 244.35481 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.35481 The provisions of NRS 244.35481 to 244.35488,
inclusive, and section 2 of this act apply only to a county whose
population is 100,000 or more.
Sec. 7. NRS 244.35482 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.35482 As used in NRS 244.35481 to 244.35488, inclusive,
and section 2 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires,
“sidewalk vendor” means a person who sells food or merchandise
upon a public sidewalk or other pedestrian path from a conveyance,
including, without limitation, a pushcart, stand, display,
-
*AB180*

– 10 –
pedal-driven cart, wagon, showcase or rack. The term includes,
without limitation, a nonstationary sidewalk vendor and a stationary
sidewalk vendor.
Sec. 8. NRS 244.35483 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.35483 1. A board of county commissioners may adopt an
ordinance regulating sidewalk vendors in accordance with the
requirements of NRS 244.35481 to 244.35488, inclusive [.] , and
section 2 of this act.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 244.35481 to
244.35488, inclusive, and section 2 of this act, a board of county
commissioners shall not:
(a) Enact or enforce a complete prohibition on sidewalk
vendors.
(b) Impose a criminal penalty on the act of sidewalk vending in
a residential area.
(c) Enact or enforce an ordinance restricting a sidewalk
vendor from selling food or merchandise in or in any location
immediately adjacent to a park owned or operated by the county,
unless:
(1) The operator of the park has signed an agreement for
concessions that exclusively permits the sale of food or
merchandise by the concessionaire; or
(2) The restriction is objectively and directly related to the
health, safety and welfare concerns of the public.
3. A board of county commissioners that does not adopt an
ordinance that complies or substantially complies with NRS
244.35481 to 244.35488, inclusive, and section 2 of this act shall
not cite, fine or prosecute a sidewalk vendor for a violation of any
rule or regulation that is inconsistent with the provisions of NRS
244.35481 to 244.35488, inclusive [.] , and section 2 of this act.
4. If a board of county commissioners adopts an ordinance
pursuant to this section, the board of county commissioners shall
post on its Internet website a map of the zones where a person may
engage in the act of sidewalk vending.
Sec. 9. NRS 244.35485 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.35485 An ordinance adopted by a board of county
commissioners regulating sidewalk vendors pursuant to NRS
244.35483 may require that a sidewalk vendor:
1. Hold:
(a) A permit or license for sidewalk vending;
(b) A state business license; and
(c) Any other licenses issued by a state or local governmental
agency to the extent otherwise required by law.
 Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a sidewalk
vendor to not comply with any requirement to obtain a state
-
*AB180*

– 11 –
business license or other license issued by a state agency or any
permit or license issued by a local government, agency or board of
health to the extent otherwise required by law.
2. Submit information to the designated representative of the
county relating to his or her operations, including, without
limitation:
(a) The name and current mailing address of the sidewalk
vendor;
(b) If the sidewalk vendor is an agent of an individual, company,
partnership or corporation, the name and business address of the
principal office;
(c) A description of the food or merchandise offered for sale;
and
(d) A certification by the sidewalk vendor that, to the best of his
or her knowledge and belief, the information submitted pursuant to
this section is true.
Sec. 10. NRS 244.35487 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
244.35487 1. In accordance with an ordinance adopted
pursuant to NRS 244.35481 to 244.35488, inclusive, and section 2
of this act, a board of county commissioners or its designee may:
(a) Suspend or revoke any permit or license for sidewalk
vending for any violation of the ordinance or the terms or conditions
of the permit or license in the same manner as such suspensions or
revocations are imposed for other types of businesses;
(b) Impose a civil penalty on the holder of a permit or license for
sidewalk vending that engages in sidewalk vending in a prohibited
residential area or for any violation of the terms or conditions of the
permit or license in accordance with the schedule of civil penalties
set forth in the ordinance, if any;
(c) Impose a civil penalty on a person who engages in sidewalk
vending without holding a permit or license for sidewalk vending
required by the ordinance in accordance with the schedule of civil
penalties set forth in the ordinance, if any; and
(d) Authorize any other action to prevent the sale or
consumption of any food or drink that violates any requirements
established by a local board of health pursuant to NRS 446.861.
2. For any person who engages in sidewalk vending without
holding a permit or license for sidewalk vending or who engages in
sidewalk vending in a prohibited area, a board of county
commissioners or its designee may also take any other action
authorized under existing law to enforce any prohibition on
unlicensed business activities, including, without limitation, any
action authorized pursuant to NRS 244.35484.
-
*AB180*

– 12 –
Sec. 11. NRS 244.35488 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
244.35488 The provisions of NRS 244.35481 to 244.35488,
inclusive, and section 2 of this act shall not be construed to:
1. Exempt a person from complying with any state or local law
or regulation;
2. Provide a defense to any criminal charge unrelated to the act
of sidewalk vending; or
3. Affect the rights of a private property owner to use or
authorize or limit the use of a sidewalk that is owned by the private
property owner, including, without limitation, a privately owned
sidewalk that is subject to an easement for public access.
Sec. 12. Chapter 268 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 13 and 14 of this act.
Sec. 13. 1. A city council or other governing body of an
incorporated city whose population is 60,000 or more, that has
adopted an ordinance regulating sidewalk vendors pursuant to
NRS 268.097993 which requires a sidewalk vendor to hold a
permit or license for sidewalk vending shall enter into an
agreement in accordance with the provisions of NRS 277.080 to
277.180, inclusive, with the board of county commissioners of the
county in which the city is located, with the city council or other
governing body of every other incorporated city located within the
county whose population is 60,000 or more and with the city
council or other governing body of each incorporated city located
within the county whose population is less than 60,000 who
chooses to enter into such an agreement for the establishment of a
business license to authorize a person who is permitted or licensed
as a sidewalk vendor pursuant to this section and NRS 268.097991
to 268.097998, inclusive, to engage in the business of sidewalk
vending within the county and each of those cities.
2. The agreement required pursuant to subsection 1 must set
forth the purposes, powers, rights, obligations and responsibilities,
financial or otherwise, of the county and each city that enters into
the agreement.
3. Upon entering into the agreement required pursuant to
subsection 1, the city council or other governing body of the
incorporated city shall establish by ordinance a system for issuing
a business license that authorizes a person who is permitted or
licensed as a sidewalk vendor pursuant to this section and NRS
268.097991 to 268.097998, inclusive, to engage in the business of
sidewalk vending within the county and each city that entered into
the agreement pursuant to subsection 1 and in which the person
intends to conduct business.
-
*AB180*

– 13 –
4. An ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection 3 must
include, without limitation:
(a) The requirements for obtaining the business license;
(b) The fees for the issuance and renewal of the business
license; and
(c) Any other requirements necessary to establish the system
for issuing the business license.
5. A person who is required to hold a permit or license for
sidewalk vending pursuant to this section and NRS 268.097991 to
268.097998, inclusive, is eligible to obtain from the city a business
license that authorizes the person to engage in the business of
sidewalk vending within the county and each city located in the
county which enters into an agreement pursuant to subsection 1
and in which the person intends to engage in the business of
sidewalk vending if the person meets the requirements to obtain
the license set forth in the ordinance adopted pursuant to
subsection 3.
6. A person who obtains a business license described in this
section is subject to:
(a) All requirements of the county or city in which the person
is doing business that are set forth in an ordinance regulating
sidewalk vendors adopted pursuant to NRS 244.35485 or
268.097993; and
(b) All other licensing and permitting requirements of the
State and any other counties and cities in which the person does
business.
7. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter and NRS
239.0115, all personal information connected to a business license
issued pursuant to this section is confidential and must not be
disclosed except as required to administer the system established
pursuant to subsection 3 or to comply with a state law or state or
federal court order.
Sec. 14. 1. A city council or other governing body of an
incorporated city whose population is 60,000 or more shall enter
into an agreement in accordance with the provisions of NRS
277.080 to 277.180, inclusive, with the board of county
commissioners of the county in which the city is located, and with
the city council or other governing body of each incorporated city
located within the county whose population is less than 60,000
who chooses to enter into such an agreement for the establishment
of a business license to authorize a person who is both licensed as
a food establishment and operating as a mobile unit pursuant to
chapter 446 of NRS to engage in the business of operating as a
mobile unit within the county and each of those cities.
-
*AB180*

– 14 –
2. The agreement required pursuant to subsection 1 must set
forth the purposes, powers, rights, obligations and responsibilities,
financial and otherwise, of the county and each city that enters
into the agreement.
3. Upon entering into the agreement pursuant to subsection
1, the city council or other governing body of the incorporated city
shall establish by ordinance a system for issuing such a business
license that authorizes a person who is both licensed as a food
establishment and operating as a mobile unit pursuant to chapter
446 of NRS to engage in that business within the county and each
city that entered into the agreement pursuant to subsection 1 and
in which the person intends to conduct business.
4. An ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection 3 must
include, without limitation:
(a) The requirements for obtaining the business license;
(b) The fees for issuance and renewal of the business license;
and
(c) Any other requirements necessary to establish the system
for issuing the business license.
5. A person who is both licensed as a food establishment and
operating as a mobile unit pursuant to chapter 446 of NRS is
eligible to obtain from the city a business license that authorizes
the person to engage in that business within the county and each
city located in the county which enters into an agreement pursuant
to subsection 1 and in which the person intends to conduct
business if the person meets the requirements for obtaining the
business license set forth in the ordinance adopted pursuant to
subsection 3.
6. A person who obtains a business license described in this
section is subject to all other requirements of the county or city in
which the person is doing business and all other licensing and
permitting requirements of the State and any other counties and
cities which the person does business.
7. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter and NRS
239.0115, all personal information connected to a business license
issued pursuant to this section is confidential and must not be
disclosed except as required to administer the licensure program
or comply with a state law or state or federal court order.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Food establishment” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 446.020.
(b) “Mobile unit” means any vehicle operating from an
approved servicing area in which food, beverages, frozen desserts
or dairy products and mixes are prepared, processed or converted
for human consumption and which is used to sell and dispense
-
*AB180*

– 15 –
food and beverages to customers. The term does not include a
push cart or any similar operation.
Sec. 15. NRS 268.0951 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.0951 1. The governing body of each incorporated city
whose population is [150,000] 60,000 or more and which is located
in a county whose population is [700,000] 100,000 or more, whether
organized under general law or special charter, shall enter into an
agreement in accordance with the provisions of NRS 277.080 to
277.180, inclusive, with the board of county commissioners of the
county in which the city is located, with the governing body of
every other city located within the county whose population is
[150,000] 60,000 or more and with the governing body of each city
located within the county whose population is less than [150,000]
60,000 who chooses to enter into such an agreement for the
establishment of a business license to authorize a person who is
licensed as a contractor pursuant to chapter 624 of NRS to engage in
the business of contracting within the county and each of those
cities.
2. The agreement required pursuant to subsection 1 must set
forth the purposes, powers, rights, obligations and responsibilities,
financial and otherwise, of the county and each city that enters into
the agreement.
3. Upon entering into the agreement required pursuant to
subsection 1, the governing body of the city shall establish by
ordinance a system for issuing such a business license that
authorizes a person who is licensed as a contractor pursuant to
chapter 624 of NRS to engage in the business of contracting within
the county and cities that entered into the agreement pursuant to
subsection 1 and in which the person intends to conduct business.
4. An ordinance adopted pursuant to the provisions of
subsection 3 must include, without limitation:
(a) The requirements for obtaining the business license;
(b) The fees for the issuance and renewal of the business license;
and
(c) Any other requirements necessary to establish the system for
issuing the business license.
5. A person who is licensed as a contractor pursuant to chapter
624 of NRS is eligible to obtain from the city a business license that
authorizes the person to engage in the business of contracting within
the county and each city located in the county which enters into an
agreement pursuant to subsection 1 and in which the person intends
to conduct business if the person meets the requirements set forth in
the ordinance to qualify for the license and:
-
*AB180*

– 16 –
(a) The person maintains only one place of business within the
county and the place of business is located within the jurisdiction of
the city;
(b) The person maintains more than one place of business within
the county and each of those places of business is located within the
jurisdiction of the city; or
(c) The person does not maintain any place of business within
the county.
6. A person who obtains a business license described in this
section is subject to all other licensing and permitting requirements
of the State and any other counties and cities in which the person
does business.
Sec. 16. NRS 268.097991 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
268.097991 The provisions of NRS 268.097991 to
268.097998, inclusive, and section 13 of this act apply only to a
city in a county whose population is 100,000 or more.
Sec. 17. NRS 268.097992 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
268.097992 As used in NRS 268.097991 to 268.097998,
inclusive, and section 13 of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, “sidewalk vendor” means a person who sells food or
merchandise upon a public sidewalk or other pedestrian path from a
conveyance, including, without limitation, a pushcart, stand, display,
pedal-driven cart, wagon, showcase or rack. The term includes,
without limitation, a nonstationary sidewalk vendor and a stationary
sidewalk vendor.
Sec. 18. NRS 268.097993 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
268.097993 1. A city council or other governing body of an
incorporated city may adopt an ordinance regulating sidewalk
vendors in accordance with the requirements of NRS 268.097991 to
268.097998, inclusive [.] , and section 13 of this act.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.097991 to
268.097998, inclusive, and section 13 of this act, a city council or
other governing body of an incorporated city shall not:
(a) Enact or enforce a complete prohibition on sidewalk
vendors.
(b) Impose a criminal penalty on the act of sidewalk vending in
a residential area.
(c) Enact or enforce an ordinance restricting a sidewalk
vendor from selling food or merchandise in or in any location
immediately adjacent to a park owned or operated by the city,
unless:
-
*AB180*

– 17 –
(1) The operator of the park has signed an agreement for
concessions that exclusively permits the sale of food or
merchandise by the concessionaire; or
(2) The restriction is objectively and directly related to the
health safety and welfare concerns of the public.
3. A city council or other governing body of an incorporated
city that does not adopt an ordinance that complies or substantially
complies with NRS 268.097991 to 268.097998, inclusive, and
section 13 of this act shall not cite, fine or prosecute a sidewalk
vendor for a violation of any rule or regulation that is inconsistent
with the provisions of NRS 268.097991 to 268.097998, inclusive [.]
, and section 13 of this act.
4. If a city council or other governing body of an incorporated
city adopts an ordinance pursuant to this section, the city council or
other governing body shall post on its Internet website a map of the
zones where a person may engage in the act of sidewalk vending.
Sec. 19. NRS 268.097995 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
268.097995 An ordinance adopted by a city council or other
governing body of an incorporated city regulating sidewalk vendors
pursuant to NRS 268.097993 may require that a sidewalk vendor:
1. Hold:
(a) A permit or license for sidewalk vending;
(b) A state business license; and
(c) Any other licenses issued by a state or local governmental
agency to the extent otherwise required by law.
 Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a sidewalk
vendor to not comply with any requirement to obtain a state
business license or other license issued by a state agency or any
permit or license issued by a local government, agency or board of
health to the extent otherwise required by law.
2. Submit information to the designated representative of the
city relating to his or her operations, including, without limitation:
(a) The name and current mailing address of the sidewalk
vendor;
(b) If the sidewalk vendor is an agent of an individual, company,
partnership or corporation, the name and business address of the
principal office;
(c) A description of the food or merchandise offered for sale;
and
(d) A certification by the sidewalk vendor that, to the best of his
or her knowledge and belief, the information submitted pursuant to
this section is true.
Sec. 20. NRS 268.097997 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
-
*AB180*

– 18 –
268.097997 1. In accordance with an ordinance adopted
pursuant to NRS 268.097991 to 268.097998, inclusive, and section
13 of this act, a city council or other governing body of an
incorporated city, or a designee of the city council or other
governing body, may:
(a) Suspend or revoke any permit or license for sidewalk
vending for any violation of the ordinance or the terms or conditions
of the permit or license in the same manner as such suspensions or
revocations are imposed for other types of businesses;
(b) Impose a civil penalty on the holder of a permit or license for
sidewalk vending that engages in sidewalk vending in a prohibited
residential area or for any violation of the terms or conditions of the
permit or license in accordance with the schedule of civil penalties
set forth in the ordinance, if any;
(c) Impose a civil penalty on a person who engages in sidewalk
vending without holding a permit or license for sidewalk vending
required by the ordinance in accordance with the schedule of civil
penalties set forth in the ordinance, if any; and
(d) Authorize any other action to prevent the sale or
consumption of any food or drink that violates any requirements
established by a local board of health pursuant to NRS 446.861.
2. For any person who engages in sidewalk vending without
holding a permit or license for sidewalk vending or who engages in
sidewalk vending in a prohibited area, a city council or other
governing body of an incorporated city, or a designee of the city
council or other governing body, may also take any other action
authorized under existing law to enforce any prohibition on
unlicensed business activities, including, without limitation, any
action authorized pursuant to NRS 268.097994.
Sec. 21. NRS 268.097998 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
268.097998 The provisions of NRS 268.097991 to
268.097998, inclusive, and section 13 of this act shall not be
construed to:
1. Exempt a person from complying with any state or local law
or regulation;
2. Provide a defense to any criminal charge unrelated to the act
of sidewalk vending; or
3. Affect the rights of a private property owner to use or
authorize or limit the use of a sidewalk that is owned by the private
property owner, including, without limitation, a privately owned
sidewalk that is subject to an easement for public access.
Sec. 22. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
-
*AB180*

– 19 –
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
-
*AB180*

– 20 –
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and sections 2, 3, 13 and 14 of this act, sections 35, 38
and 41 of chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of
-
*AB180*

– 21 –
chapter 391, Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared
by law to be confidential, all public books and public records of a
governmental entity must be open at all times during office hours to
inspection by any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or
memorandum may be prepared from those public books and public
records. Any such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to
supply the general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the
records or may be used in any other way to the advantage of the
governmental entity or of the general public. This section does not
supersede or in any manner affect the federal laws governing
copyrights or enlarge, diminish or affect in any other manner the
rights of a person in any written book or record which is
copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
-
*AB180*

– 22 –
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
H
-
*AB180*